Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.200

Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

The director, in implementing and administering the provisions of this chapter, shall act in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1993 c 260 s 21.]